Utah statutes.
53A-15-402.   Director of adult education.

(1)  Upon recommendation of the state superintendent, the State Board of Education may appoint a full-time director for adult education to work under the supervision of the board.

(2)  The director may coordinate the adult education program authorized under Sections 53A-15-401 through 53A-15-405 with other adult education programs.

